District of Columbia statutes.
1-1402

Purpose.

The purpose of the Office is to centralize responsibility for the District government’s investments in information technology and telecommunications systems to help District departments and agencies provide services more efficiently and effectively. The Office will develop and enforce policy directives and standards regarding information technology and telecommunications systems throughout the District government. The Office will also serve as a source of expertise for District departments and agencies seeking to use information technology and telecommunications systems to improve services. In addition, the Office may work to ensure that reasonable, affordable access to high-speed Internet services is available to District residents and businesses.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1813, 45 DCR 7193
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1042(a), 57 DCR 6242

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1406.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1195.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223 added the last sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of §§ 1-1195.1 to 1-1195.5 1981 Ed., see note to § 1-1401.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 1-1401.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1042(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1041 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle E of title I of the act may be cited as the “Technology Services Amendment Act of 2010”.

Editor's Notes

Establishment of Geographic Information System Steering Committee, see Mayor’s Order 2002-27, February 15, 2002 ( 49 DCR 1298).